Hawaii statutes.
§321-343 Access to information; use of
child death review information; protections. (a) Upon written request of
the director, all providers of health care, social services, and state and
county agencies shall disclose to the department, and those individuals
appointed by the director to participate in the review of child deaths, child
death review information regarding the circumstances of a child's death so that
the department may conduct a multidisciplinary and multiagency review of child
deaths pursuant to section 321-31 and this part. All requested disclosures
shall comply with state and federal privacy statutes and regulations, including
the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, and the department
shall not request records of any internal hospital committee, peer review
committee, or quality improvement review process. The department may enter
into a memorandum of agreement with hospitals regarding requests for
information to be used for child death reviews.

(b) To the extent that this section conflicts
with other state confidentiality and disclosure laws, this section shall
prevail.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this part,
all child death review information acquired by the department during its review
of child deaths pursuant to this part is confidential and may only be disclosed
as necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(d) No individual participating in the review
of a child death shall be questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding
regarding information presented in or opinions formed as a result of a
multidisciplinary review. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
prevent a person from testifying to information obtained independently of the
department's request for child death review information or the
multidisciplinary team's review of the child death, or which is public
information, or where disclosure is required by a court of law.

(e) Child death review information held by the
department as a result of child death reviews conducted under this part shall
not be subject to subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence in any
civil or criminal proceeding, except that child death review information
otherwise available from other sources shall not be immune from subpoena,
discovery, or introduction into evidence through those sources solely because
they were provided to the department as required by this part. [L 1997, c 369,
pt of §1; am L 2016, c 203, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next